Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.350

Reporting of orders—Extreme risk protection orders.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1163-S2.SL) ***

(1) The clerk of the court shall enter any extreme risk protection order, including temporary extreme risk protection orders, issued under this chapter into a statewide judicial information system on the same day such order is issued, if possible, but no later than the next judicial day.

(2) A copy of an extreme risk protection order granted under this chapter, including temporary extreme risk protection orders, must be forwarded immediately by the clerk of the court, by electronic means if possible, to the law enforcement agency specified in the order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall immediately enter the order into the national instant criminal background check system, any other federal or state computer-based systems used by law enforcement or others to identify prohibited purchasers of firearms, and any computer-based criminal intelligence information system available in this state used by law enforcement agencies to list outstanding warrants. The order must remain in each system for the period stated in the order, and the law enforcement agency shall only expunge orders from the systems that have expired or terminated. Entry into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system constitutes notice to all law enforcement agencies of the existence of the order. The order is fully enforceable in any county in the state.

(3) The information entered into the computer-based criminal intelligence information system must include notice to law enforcement whether the order was personally served, served by electronic means, served by publication, or served by mail.

(4) If a law enforcement agency receives a protection order for entry or service, but the order falls outside the agency's jurisdiction, the agency may enter and serve the order or may immediately forward it to the appropriate law enforcement agency for entry and service, and shall provide documentation back to the court verifying which law enforcement agency has entered and will serve the order.

(5) The issuing court shall, within three judicial days after the issuance of any extreme risk protection order, including a temporary extreme risk protection order, forward a copy of the respondent's driver's license or identicard, or comparable information, along with the date of order issuance, to the department of licensing. Upon receipt of the information, the department of licensing shall determine if the respondent has a concealed pistol license. If the respondent does have a concealed pistol license, the department of licensing shall immediately notify a law enforcement agency that the court has directed the revocation of the license. The law enforcement agency, upon receipt of such notification, shall immediately revoke the license.

(6) If an extreme risk protection order is terminated before its expiration date, the clerk of the court shall forward on the same day a copy of the termination order to the department of licensing and the law enforcement agency specified in the termination order. Upon receipt of the order, the law enforcement agency shall promptly remove the order from any computer-based system in which it was entered pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

[ 2021 c 215 s 47.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.